Hawaii statutes.
§348-2 Definitions. For the
purposes of this chapter:

"Department" means the department of
human services.

"Director" means the director of
human services.

"Eligible handicapped individual",
when used with respect to diagnostic and related services, training, guidance,
and placement, means any handicapped individual whose vocational rehabilitation
is determined feasible by the department of human services, and when used with
respect to other vocational rehabilitation services, means an individual meeting
the foregoing requirements who is also found by the department to require
financial assistance with respect thereto, after full consideration of the
individual's financial resources, or in the instance of minors the financial
resources of the parents, and eligibility for any similar benefit by way of
pension, compensation, insurance, or of any other available assistance.

"Establishment of a workshop or
rehabilitation facility" means:

(1) In the case of a workshop, the expansion,
remodeling, or alteration of existing buildings, necessary to adapt the
buildings to workshop purposes or to increase the employment opportunities in
workshops, and the acquisition of initial equipment necessary for new workshops
or to increase the employment opportunities in workshops; and

(2) In the case of a rehabilitation facility, the
expansion, remodeling, or alteration of existing buildings, and initial
equipment of those buildings, necessary to adapt the buildings to
rehabilitation facility purposes (subject, however, to limitations that the
director of human services may by rules prescribe in order to prevent
impairment of the objectives of, or duplication of, other federal laws
providing federal assistance to states in the construction of those
facilities), and initial staffing thereof.

"Handicapped
individual" means an individual who is under a physical or mental
disability that is stable or slowly progressive and constitutes a substantial
handicap to employment, but that is of such a nature that appropriate vocational
rehabilitation services may reasonably be expected to render the individual
able to engage in a remunerative occupation.

"Health maintenance" means payments
for medical care for acute conditions occurring in the course of vocational
rehabilitation that are not expected to last thirty days.

"Maintenance" means payments, not
exceeding the cost of subsistence, provided an eligible handicapped individual
necessary to derive the benefit of other vocational rehabilitation services
being provided to achieve the individual's vocational rehabilitation objective.

"Nonprofit", when used with respect
to a rehabilitation facility or a workshop, means a rehabilitation facility and
a workshop, respectively, owned and operated by a corporation or association,
no part of the net earnings of which inures, or may lawfully inure, to the
benefit of any private shareholder or individual and the income of which is
exempt from taxation under section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code.

"Physical restoration" includes:

(1) Corrective surgery or therapeutic treatment
necessary to correct or substantially modify a physical or mental condition
that is stable or slowly progressive and constitutes a substantial handicap to
employment, but is of such a nature that the correction or modification may
reasonably be expected to eliminate or substantially reduce the handicap within
a reasonable length of time; and includes psychiatric treatment, dentistry,
physical therapy, occupational therapy, speech or hearing therapy, treatment of
medical complications, and emergencies that are associated with or arise out of
physical restoration services or are inherent in the condition under treatment,
and other medical services related to rehabilitation;

(2) Necessary hospitalization (either inpatient or
outpatient[)] and nursing care in connection with surgery or treatment
specified in paragraph (1); and

(3) Prosthetic devices essential to obtaining or
retaining employment.

"Prosthetic appliance" means any
appliance designed to support or take the place of a part of the body, or to
increase the acuity of a sensory organ.

"Rehabilitation facility" means a
facility operated for the primary purpose of assisting in the rehabilitation of
handicapped individuals:

(1) That provides one or more of the following types
of services:

(A) Testing, fitting, or training in the use
of prosthetic devices;

(B) Prevocational or conditioning therapy;

(C) Physical or occupational therapy;

(D) Adjustment training; or

(E) Evaluation or control of special disabilities;
or

(2) Through which is provided an integrated program
of medical, psychological, social, and vocational evaluation and services under
competent professional supervision.

"Remunerative occupation" includes
employment as an employee or self-employed, practice of a profession,
homemaking, or farm and family work for which payment is in kind rather than
cash, sheltered employment and home industry or other homebound work of a
remunerative nature.

"Vocational rehabilitation" means
making an individual able, or increasing the individual's ability to engage in,
and placement in, a remunerative occupation through providing the individual
needed vocational rehabilitation services.

"Vocational rehabilitation services"
means:

(1) Diagnostic and related services (including
transportation) incidental to the determination of whether an individual is a
handicapped individual, and if so, the individual's eligibility for, and the
nature and scope of other vocational rehabilitation services to be provided; and

(2) The following services provided to eligible
handicapped individuals needing the services:

(A) Training;

(B) Guidance;

(C) Placement;

(D) Maintenance, not exceeding the estimated
costs of subsistence during vocational rehabilitation;

(E) Occupational licenses, tools, equipment,
initial stocks, and supplies (including equipment and initial stocks and
supplies for vending stands), books, and training materials;

(F) Transportation (other than provided as
diagnostic and related services);

(G) Physical restoration;

(H) Reader services for the blind;

(I) Interpreter services for the deaf;

(J) Telecommunications, sensory, or other
technological aids and devices;

(K) Services to family members;

(L) Post employment services; and

(M) Other goods and services which will
benefit an individual's employability.

"Workshop" means a place where any
manufacture or handiwork is carried on and which is operated for the primary
purpose of providing remunerative employment to severely handicapped individuals
who cannot be readily absorbed in the competitive labor market. [L 1955, c 231,
pt of §2; RL 1955, §42-31; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §18; am L 1965, c 175, §§3,
40; HRS §348-2; am L 1970, c 105, §5; am L 1979, c 188, §1(2) and c 228, §3; am
L 1980, c 116, §1; gen ch 1985; am L 1987, c 339, §4; am L 2016, c 55, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next